Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1

Purpose and Early Voting

2-6-101. Purpose of chapter and part — Construction.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide a means for qualified voters to cast their votes when they would otherwise be unable to vote.

The purpose of this part is to establish an early voting period when eligible registered voters may vote before an election at the county election commission office or another polling place appropriately designated by the county election commission.

To prevent fraud in an election, strict compliance with the provisions of this chapter is required.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-601; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2; 1995, ch. 88, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 6 was rearranged by Acts 1994, ch. 859, which divided the chapter into five parts, and transferred or repealed the existing sections. The following table lists the sections in former chapter 6 and indicates their new location, if any, in parts 1-5 of this chapter.

Former Sections New Sections

2-6-101 2-6-101

2-6-102 2-6-201

2-6-103 2-6-103

2-6-104 2-6-105

2-6-105 2-6-106

2-6-106 2-6-501

2-6-107 2-6-107

2-6-108 2-6-108

2-6-109 2-6-102, 2-6-109

2-6-110 2-6-111

2-6-111 2-6-202

2-6-112 2-6-502

2-6-113 2-6-203

2-6-114 2-6-204

2-6-115 2-6-301

2-6-116 2-6-302

2-6-117 2-6-303

2-6-118 2-6-304

2-6-119 2-6-305

2-6-120 2-6-306

2-6-121 2-6-307

2-6-122 Repealed

2-6-123 2-6-308

2-6-124 Repealed

2-6-125 2-6-309

2-6-126 2-6-310

2-6-127 2-6-311

2-6-128 2-6-312

2-6-129 2-6-401

2-6-130 2-6-503

Former §§2-6-122 and2-6-124 (Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1977, ch. 70, § 1; 1978, ch. 814, § 3; 1978, ch. 861, § 2; T.C.A., § 2-622; Acts 1991, ch. 184, § 4), concerning the forms for application for absentee voting by personal appearance and for certification of nonregistration, were repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 12.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

The Right to Vote Under State Constitutions (Joshua A. Douglas), 67 Vand. L. Rev. 89 (2014).

Attorney General Opinions. Early voting at satellite locations, OAG 06-128 (8/15/06).

2-6-102. Early voting applications — Ballots — Time for voting.

A voter who desires to vote early shall go to the county election commission office or another polling place appropriately designated by the county election commission within the posted hours not more than twenty (20) days nor less than five (5) days before the day of the election. A voter desiring to vote in the early voting period shall sign an application for a ballot.

The state coordinator shall supply or approve the form of the application for a ballot.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), in the case of a regular or special general election not held in conjunction with the regular August or November general elections, or held in conjunction with the May primary called pursuant to § 2-13-203 or the presidential preference primary, if there is no opposition for any of the offices involved, including any write-in candidate that has filed the appropriate notice pursuant to § 2-7-133(i), there shall not be an early voting period. In the case of a May primary called pursuant to § 2-13-203 or a special primary for state or federal offices, if there is no opposition on either primary ballot for any of the offices involved, including any write-in candidate that has filed the appropriate notice pursuant to § 2-8-113(c), there shall not be an early voting period.

Subdivision (b)(1) shall not apply to municipal elections held in the largest municipality located in a county having a metropolitan form of government which has a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), when a presidential preference primary is held or an election is held at the same time as a presidential preference primary, a voter who desires to vote early for such elections shall go to the county election commission office within the posted hours not more than twenty (20) days nor less than seven (7) days before the day of the election. This subsection (c) shall not apply to voting pursuant to § 2-6-601.

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-609; Acts 1982, ch. 665, § 2; 1991, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A., §2-6-109; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2; 2011, ch. 115, § 1; 2011, ch. 381, § 1; 2012, ch. 1101, § 5; 2016, ch. 650, § 1; 2018, ch. 842, §§ 3-5.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of former section in 1994, see the Compiler's Notes under §2-6-101.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (d).

The 2018 amendment rewrote (b)(1) which read: “(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), in the case of a municipal election not held in conjunction with any primary election, the regular August or November general elections, or any special primary or special general election for state or federal offices, if there is no opposition, including any write-in candidate that has filed the appropriate notice pursuant to §2-7-133(i), for any of the offices involved, there shall not be an early voting period.”; added the last sentence in (c); and deleted former (d) which read: “In the case of a special general election, if there is no opposition, including any write-in candidate that has filed the appropriate notice pursuant to §2-7-133(i), for any of the offices involved and no other items are on the ballot, there shall not be an early voting period.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 650, § 2. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 842, § 6. April 26, 2018.

Law Reviews.

New Kind of Voter Suppression in Modern Elections, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1019 (Summer 2019).

2-6-103. County election commission office hours.

The county election commission office or another polling place appropriately designated by the county election commission shall be open a minimum of three (3) consecutive hours each weekday including Saturdays between the hours of eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) and six o'clock p.m. (6:00 p.m.) prevailing time during the period provided to apply to vote early. For a municipality with a population of less than five thousand (5,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the municipal governing body may determine the Saturday schedule of early voting for municipal elections.

If the proper notice under subsection (c) is made, a county election commission may close its office on a state holiday during the period established for early voting.

On at least three (3) days during the early voting period for those offices listed in § 2-13-202, or for any state or federal election, the county election commission office shall remain open between four-thirty p.m. (4:30 p.m.) and seven o'clock p.m. (7:00 p.m.), and on at least one (1) Saturday during the same period the office shall be open from eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) to four o'clock p.m. (4:00 p.m.). The county election commission shall determine the appropriate dates for both late and regular hours at the commission office. This subsection (b) shall apply only to those counties with a population in excess of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), according to the 1970 census.

In counties affected by this subsection (b), this subsection (b) shall also apply to municipal elections for the principal municipality of the county. For such municipal elections, the municipal governing body and the county election commission shall jointly determine the appropriate dates for additional hours. The municipality shall be responsible for the costs of such additional hours.

Notice of the office hours shall be given by the county election commission not less than twenty-five (25) days prior to the day of election by publication in a newspaper of general circulation.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 228, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-603; Acts 1985, ch. 238, §§ 1-4; 1994, ch. 859, §§ 2, 12; 1996, ch. 1028, § 1; 2009, ch. 218, § 2; 2012, ch. 1101, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Commission office hours during early voting period for convenient voting centers, §2-3-307.

Newspaper of general circulation defined, §2-1-104.

2-6-104. Voting machines for early voting.

A county election commission may use voting machines for early voting. The county election commission shall choose one (1) of the following options for its method of early voting:

Place all races on a machine ballot;

Place some of the races on a machine ballot and part of the races on a paper ballot; or

Place all races on a paper ballot.

No single mechanical lever machine may have more than nine hundred ninety-nine (999) voters using a single machine during the early voting period.

No single direct recording electronic (DRE) voting system may have more than nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (9,999) voters using a single machine during the early voting period.

The county election commission shall secure each voting machine used in early voting to prohibit tampering and shall also provide maximum security that allows no other person, except for persons designated by the election commission or the administrator of elections, to have access to the room or facility in which the voting machines, ballots and other election supplies are stored.

The coordinator of elections shall, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, promulgate rules and regulations for use of voting machines for early voting. These rules and regulations shall include appropriate provisions for the security of the machines.

Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2; 1997, ch. 558, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of former section in 1994, see the Compiler's Notes under §2-6-101.

References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-6-105. Voter assistance — Assistance by person convicted of voter fraud prohibited.

Persons voting early are entitled to the same assistance in voting they would be entitled to if they appeared to vote on election day. The procedures under § 2-7-116 govern how assistance should be given.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a person convicted of voter fraud in any state shall not assist a person in voting under this section.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-604; Acts 1980, ch. 638, § 9; T.C.A., §2-6-104; Acts 1994, ch. 859, §§ 2, 12; 1995, ch. 88, § 1; 2019, ch. 271, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of former section in 1994, see the Compiler's Notes under §2-6-101.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 271, § 5. April 30, 2019.

2-6-106. Voter unable to write signature or make mark — Assistance by person convicted of voter fraud prohibited.

If an applicant or voter is so disabled that the applicant or voter cannot write a signature or make a mark where required, the action of the person who offers assistance shall be witnessed by one (1) additional person. Both the person giving assistance and the witness shall sign their names and provide their addresses.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a person convicted of voter fraud in any state shall not assist a person in voting under this section.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-605; Acts 1980, ch. 638, § 10; T.C.A., §2-6-105; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2; 2019, ch. 271, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of former section in 1994, see the Compiler's Notes under §2-6-101.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 271, § 5. April 30, 2019.

2-6-107. Application and supplies limited.

The election commission shall furnish only one (1) application for early voting or one (1) set of early voting supplies to any voter unless the voter notifies the commission that the voter has spoiled the application or notifies the commission that the voter has not received the application or voting supplies. If so, the commission shall supply the voter with a subsequent application or supplies. The commission shall note on the records that a subsequent application or supplies have been sent.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-607; Acts 1993, ch. 518, § 7; 1994, ch. 859, §§ 2, 12.

2-6-108. Attesting officials.

In each county, the county election commissioners of the minority party may appoint one (1) early voting deputy who shall receive as compensation for each day spent in such service the same pay as an election official in the county for which such person is appointed.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1973, ch. 305, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 306, § 12; T.C.A., § 2-608; Acts 1982, ch. 566, § 1; 1988, ch. 651, § 1; 1988, ch. 933, § 8; 1994, ch. 859, §§ 2, 12; 1995, ch. 88, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-6-109. Verification of signature — Voting — Affidavits — Voting booths.

Upon completion of the application, the administrator of elections shall compare the signature of the voter with the signature on the voter's permanent registration record, or other evidence of identification if computerized duplicate registration records are used, and shall endorse on the application that the two (2) signatures are, or are not, the same. The administrator shall make a determination whether the voter's address is different from the address on the voter's permanent registration record or if the registration is in inactive status. If the voter has changed residence, or the voter's registration is inactive, the administrator shall follow the procedures for voting pursuant to § 2-7-140. Upon determination that the voter is entitled to vote early in the election, the administrator shall hand to the voter, after recording the ballot number on the voter's permanent registration record:

Instructions; and

One (1) early voting ballot or one (1) primary early voting ballot or both.

In a computerized county, the administrator may record the ballot number on the computer-generated duplicate registration record or the voter's application to vote.

The voter shall show the unmarked ballot to the early voting official, mark the ballot in secret at the place provided in the commission office, either fold the ballot or place it in a secrecy sleeve provided by the election commission in order to preserve the secrecy of the ballot, and return to the early voting official.

The early voting official shall direct the voter to the correct general election early voting ballot box and/or party primary early voting ballot box according to the election and precinct in which the voter voted. The voter shall deposit the ballot in the appropriate ballot box or boxes.

Except in cases in which computerized duplicate registration records are used, the attesting official shall, in the presence of the voter, note on the voter's duplicate permanent registration record that the voter has voted early in the election and in every case, including those counties in which computerized duplicate registration records are used, record the voter's name on the early voting poll book for each election in which the voter voted.

In those counties in which computerized duplicate registration records are used, the attesting official shall update the voter's computerized voter history by making the appropriate data entry.

A county election commission may use any voting machine authorized for use under chapter 9 of this title for early voting.

The county election commission must provide a place where the voter may mark the ballot in complete secrecy and privacy.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 316, § 2; T.C.A., § 2-609; Acts 1982, ch. 665, § 2; 1988, ch. 993, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 69, § 1; 1994, ch. 859, §§ 2, 12; 1995, ch. 88, §§ 3-5; 1997, ch. 550, § 6; 1997, ch. 558, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of former subsection (a) in 1994, see the Compiler's Notes under §2-6-101.

References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-6-110. Early voting application — Uniform forms.

The coordinator of elections shall adopt a uniform form for each county election commission for an application for early voting.

Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2.

2-6-111. Filling out application to vote early.

The administrator of elections shall fill out the application to vote early except for the applicant's signature or mark.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 2-610, 2-6-110; Acts 1994, ch. 859, §§ 2, 12; 1995, ch. 88, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of former section in 1994, see the Compiler's Notes under §2-6-101.

References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Cross-References. Form of affidavit, §2-6-109.

Form of application, §2-6-110.

2-6-112. Satellite voting location — Option not to have early voting.

Upon the request of a municipality, for elections at a time other than the regular August or regular November election, the county election commission shall establish a satellite voting location for early voting within the corporate limits of such municipality. The municipality shall be responsible for the costs of such voting location.

Upon the request of a municipality that has established a satellite voting location under subsection (a), the county election commission may choose not to have early voting at the county election commission office.

Acts 2000, ch. 593, § 1; 2006, ch. 642, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer or repeal of former §2-6-112 in 1994, see the Compiler's Notes under §2-6-101.

2-6-113. Designation of satellite location outside boundaries of one of counties where municipality lies in two or more counties.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if a municipality is located within two (2) or more counties of the state, then the county election commissions of each respective county may, by written mutual agreement of the counties, designate one (1) satellite location for early voting outside the boundaries of one (1) of the respective counties; provided, that the location for early voting is within the limits of the municipality and within five hundred feet (500') of the county boundary line.

Acts 2014, ch. 697, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 697, § 3. April 15, 2014.